North Carolina statutes. Chapter 63A. North Carolina Global TransPark Authority.
§ 63A-1.
Short title and intent.

This Chapter is the “North Carolina Global TransPark Authority Act.” It is enacted in part pursuant to Article V, Section 13, of the North Carolina Constitution with the intent that the body politic and corporate created by this Chapter shall have all power and authority as may be provided to it under that section of the Constitution.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 4(b).

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1991, c. 749, s. 2, provides: “Interpretation of act.

“(a) This act shall not be deemed to exclude additional or alternative methods for executing the provisions of this act, shall be regarded as supplemental to power conferred by other laws, and shall not be regarded as in derogation of any powers now existing.

“(b) This act, being necessary for the health and welfare of the people of this State, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes.

“(c) Insofar as the provisions of this act are inconsistent with the provisions of any general laws, the provisions of this act shall be controlling.

“(d) Insofar as the provisions of this act are inconsistent with the provisions of any local, special, or private laws, the provisions of those laws are repealed to the extent of the conflict.

“(e) If any provisions of this act or its application are held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

“(f) References in this act to specific acts, sections, or Chapters of the General Statutes are intended to be references to such acts, sections, or chapters as they may be amended from time to time by the General Assembly.”

Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 4(a), effective July 17, 1994, renamed this Chapter, which had been entitled the North Carolina Air Cargo Airport Authority. In making this change the act misquoted the former name of the chapter. The act was in the coded bill drafting format provided by

G.S. 120-20.1

. The chapter name has been set out as above at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes.

Session Laws 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, which amended this section, in s. (4)(
l
) provides:
“Any reference to the North Carolina Air Cargo Airport Authority in any other act of the General Assembly is deemed to refer to the North Carolina Global TransPark Authority.”

Legal Periodicals.

For a comment on the acquisition, abandonment, and preservation of rail corridors in North Carolina, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 1989 (1997).

§ 63A-2.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply in this Chapter:

Aircraft. — A contrivance that is used or designed for flight.

Airport project. — Any of the following that is part of or is used in connection with a cargo airport or a facility at a cargo airport complex site and is not a special user project:

Land, equipment, or buildings or other structures, whether located on one or more sites.

The addition to or the rehabilitation, improvement, renovation, or enlargement of any property described in subpart a.

The term includes infrastructure improvements, such as improvements to railroad facilities, roads, bridges, and water, sewer, or electric utilities even if not located on a cargo airport complex site. An airport project may include a facility leased to one or more entities under a true lease.

Authority. — The North Carolina Global TransPark Authority.

Board. — The Board of Directors of the Authority.

Bonds. — The revenue bonds or other interest bearing obligations authorized to be issued by the Authority under this Chapter.

Cargo airport. — Any area of land or water that is designed for the landing and takeoff of aircraft, any appurtenant area used or suitable for airport buildings or other airport facilities, and any appurtenant right-of-way. In addition to facilities for the transportation of cargo by aircraft, a cargo airport may contain facilities to shelter, service, or repair aircraft and facilities to discharge and receive passengers.

Cargo airport complex. — A cargo airport and all other facilities, including private facilities, related to the cargo airport that are located within the cargo airport complex site.

Cargo airport complex site. — The area designated by the Authority as the location of a cargo airport complex. An area may not be so designated by the Authority unless all or a substantial portion of the land on which the cargo airport is located or is to be located is or shall be owned by the Authority or is or shall be controlled by the Authority pursuant to lease, joint operating agreement, or other contractual arrangements.

Costs. — The capital cost of a project, including:

The costs of doing any or all of the following:

Acquiring, constructing, erecting, providing, developing, installing, furnishing, and equipping.

Reconstructing, remodeling, altering, renovating, replacing, refurnishing, and reequipping.

Enlarging, expanding, and extending.

Demolishing, relocating, improving, grading, draining, landscaping, paving, widening, and resurfacing.

The costs of all property, both real and personal and both improved and unimproved, and of plants, works, appurtenances, structures, facilities, furnishings, machinery, equipment, vehicles, easements, water rights, air rights, franchises, and licenses used or useful in connection with the project.

The costs of demolishing or moving structures from land acquired and acquiring land to which the structures are to be moved.

Financing charges, including estimated interest during the acquisition or construction of a project and for one year thereafter.

The costs of services to provide plans, specifications, studies, reports, surveys, and estimates of costs and revenues.

The costs of paying any interim financing, including principal, interest and premium, related to the acquisition or construction of the project.

Administrative and legal expenses and administrative charges.

The costs of obtaining bond and reserve fund insurance and investment contracts, of credit-enhancement facilities, liquidity facilities, and interest-rate agreements, and of establishing and maintaining debt service and other reserves.

Any other services, costs, and expenses necessary or incidental to the project.

Credit facility. — An agreement with a banking institution, an insurance institution, an investment institution, or other financial institution located inside or outside the United States of America that provides for prompt payment, whether at maturity, presentment, or tender for purchase, redemption, or acceleration, of part or all of the principal or purchase price, redemption premium, if any, and interest on a bond or note issued by the Authority and for repayment of the institution.

Financing agreement. — A written instrument establishing the rights and responsibilities of the Authority and the operator concerning a special user project financed by the issuance of bonds. A financing agreement may be a lease, a lease and lease-back, a sale and lease-back, a lease purchase, an installment sale and purchase agreement, a conditional sales agreement, a secured or unsecured loan agreement, or other similar contract, and may involve property in addition to the property financed with the bonds.

Local Government Commission. — The Local Government Commission of the Department of State Treasurer, established by Article 2 of Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

Notes. — Revenue notes or revenue bond anticipation notes issued by the Authority under this Chapter.

Obligor. — A person, including an operator, who has entered into a financing or other agreement obligating the person to make payments to the Authority or to holders of bonds issued to finance a special user project.

Operator. — The person entitled to the use or occupancy of a special user project.

Par formula. — A provision or formula to make periodic adjustments in the interest rate of a bond or note, including:

A provision for an adjustment to keep the purchase price of the bond or note in the open market as close to par as possible.

A provision for an adjustment based on one or more percentages of a prime rate or base rate that may vary or apply for specified periods of time.

Any other provision that does not materially and adversely affect the financial position of the Authority and the marketing of the bonds or notes at a reasonable interest cost to the Authority.

Person. — Any person, corporation, partnership, association, trust, or other legal entity.

Project. — An airport project or a special user project.

Revenues. — For a special user project, the term means rents, fees, charges, payments, proceeds, or other income or profit derived from the special user project or from the financing agreement or security document for the special user project. For an airport project, the term means rents, fees, charges, payments, proceeds, or other income or profit derived from the airport project or from any pledge of nontax revenues, appropriation, or payment made by the State or a county in which the cargo airport is located.

Security document. — One or more written instruments establishing the rights and responsibilities of the Authority and the holders of bonds issued to finance a special user project. A security document may provide for, or be in the form of an agreement with, a trustee for the benefit of the bondholders. A security document may contain an assignment, pledge, mortgage, or other encumbrance of part or all of the Authority’s interest in, or right to receive revenues from, a special user project or any other property provided by the operator or other obligor under a financing agreement. A financing agreement and a security document may be combined as one instrument.

Special user project. — Any land, equipment, or buildings or other structures located on one or more sites within a cargo airport complex site and the addition to or the rehabilitation, improvement, renovation, or enlargement of a structure located within a cargo airport complex site when the property is to be used as or in connection with any of the following:

An undertaking for industry, including an industrial or a manufacturing factory, mill, assembly plant, or fabricating plant, a freight terminal, an industrial research, development, or laboratory facility, or an industrial processing or distribution facility for industrial or manufactured products.

A commercial, processing, mining, transportation, distribution, storage, marine, aviation, or environmental facility or improvement.

Any combination of items mentioned in subparts a. and b.

A special user project, during its economic life, is to be principally used by one or more for-profit entities other than as lessee under a true lease. A special user project may include all appurtenances and incidental facilities such as land, a headquarters or office facility, warehouses, distribution centers, access roads, sidewalks, utilities, railway sidings, trucking and similar facilities, parking facilities, waterways, docks, wharves, and other improvements necessary or convenient for the construction, maintenance, and operation of any structure.

True lease. — A lease that has a fair market value rental and is not treated as a financing lease or installment sale for federal tax law purposes.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 108(a); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 4(c).

§ 63A-3.
Creation of Authority and Board.

Creation. — The North Carolina Global TransPark Authority is created as a body corporate and politic having the powers and jurisdiction as provided under this Chapter or any other law. The Authority is a State agency created to perform essential governmental and public functions. The Authority shall be located within the Department of Transportation and shall be subject to the direction and supervision of the Secretary.

Board of Directors. — The Authority shall be governed by a Board of Directors. The Board shall consist of at least the following 20 members:

Six members appointed by the Governor. One member shall be representative of the economic development industry, two members shall be representative of the commercial real estate development industry, two members shall be representative of the banking and finance industry, and one member shall be representative of environmental interests.

Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

. One member shall be representative of the aerospace and aviation industry, one member shall be representative of advanced manufacturing industries, and one member shall be representative of the logistics and supply chain management industry.

Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

. One member shall be representative of the aerospace and aviation industry, one member shall be representative of the emergency response and disaster relief industries, and one member shall be representative of the defense and security industry.

The State Treasurer, who shall serve as an ex officio nonvoting member.

The President of the North Carolina System of Community Colleges or the President’s designee, provided that the President of the North Carolina Community Colleges may instead appoint to the Board of Directors one member of the board of trustees of a community college or one president of a community college. If such an appointment is made, the appointee shall serve at the pleasure of the President.

The President of The University of North Carolina or the President’s designee, provided that the President of the University of North Carolina may instead appoint to the Board of Directors one member of the board of trustees of a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, or one chancellor of a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina. If such an appointment is made, the appointee shall serve at the pleasure of the President.

The Chairman of the State Ports Authority.

One member appointed by the board of county commissioners of any county in which the cargo airport complex site is located.

One member appointed by the city council of the city which is a county seat of any county in which the cargo airport complex site is located.

The Commissioner of Agriculture or the Commissioner’s designee.

The Secretary of the Department of Commerce or the Secretary’s designee.Within 90 days after the Authority acquires land, either by purchase or condemnation, for development as part of a cargo airport complex site, the board of county commissioners in any county in which a portion of the land is located and the city council of the city which is the county seat of the county shall, by resolution, each appoint a person to serve as a member of the Board. If the board of commissioners or the city council appoints one of its own members to the Board, the county commissioner or the member of the city council who is appointed is considered to be serving on the Board as an ex officio voting member as part of the duties of the office of county commissioner or the office of city council member, in accordance with

G.S. 128-1.2

, and is not considered to be serving in a separate office. Notwithstanding

G.S. 116-31(h)

, a member of the board of trustees of a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina appointed to the Board of Directors under subdivision (6) of this subsection may concurrently serve on the board of trustees and the Board of Directors. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Governor may serve on the Board of Directors by his own appointment on or after July 16, 1991, under subdivision (1) of this subsection.As the holder of an office, each member of the Board shall take the oath required by Article VI, § 7 of the North Carolina Constitution before assuming the duties of a Board member.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-340, s. 1(c), effective July 1, 2011.

Terms. — The terms of the initial members appointed by the Governor or the General Assembly end June 30, 1993. The initial term of a member appointed by a board of county commissioners or by a city council ends on the second June 30 after the appointment. Subsequent appointments by a board of county commissioners or by a city council shall be for terms of four years. The seven members appointed by the Governor for subsequent terms shall be appointed for terms of two years ending on June 30 of each odd-numbered year. The six members appointed by the General Assembly for subsequent terms shall be divided into two classes. The first class shall consist of three persons, two of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, to serve an initial term expiring June 30, 1995, with subsequent terms expiring each fourth June 30th thereafter. The second class shall consist of three persons, two of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and one of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, to serve an initial term expiring June 30, 1997, with subsequent terms expiring each fourth June 30th thereafter.

(d1)

Notwithstanding the terms of board members appointed by the General Assembly as specified in subsection (d) of this section, terms of board members appointed by the General Assembly shall end June 30, 2011. After June 30, 2011, the six members appointed by the General Assembly shall be divided into two classes. The first class shall consist of three persons, two of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives and one of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, to serve an initial term expiring June 30, 2013, with subsequent terms expiring each fourth June 30th thereafter. The second class shall consist of three persons, two of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and one of whom shall be appointed upon recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives, to serve an initial term expiring June 30, 2015, with subsequent terms expiring each fourth June 30th thereafter.

Chair and Vice-chair of the Board. — The Governor shall designate one of the members appointed by the Governor as the Chair of the Board. The Governor shall convene the first meeting of the Board, at which time the members of the Board shall elect from their membership a Vice-chair of the Board.

Vacancies. — All members of the Board shall remain in office until their successors are appointed and qualify. A vacancy in an appointment made by the Governor or a board of county commissioners shall be filled by the Governor or the board of county commissioners for the remainder of the unexpired term. A vacancy in an appointment made by the General Assembly shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. A person appointed to fill a vacancy shall qualify in the same manner as a person appointed for a full term.

Removal of Board Members. — The Governor may remove any member of the Board for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in accordance with G.S. 143B-13(d). The person who appointed a member of the Board may remove the member for using improper influence in accordance with G.S. 143B-13(c).

Organization of the Board. — The Board shall adopt bylaws with respect to the calling of meetings, quorums, voting procedures, the keeping of records, and other organizational and administrative matters as the Board may determine. A quorum shall consist of a majority of the members of the Board. No vacancy in the membership of the Board shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise all rights and to perform all the duties of the Board and the Authority.

Compensation of the Board. — No part of the revenues or assets of the Authority shall inure to the benefit of or be distributable to the members of the Board or officers or other private persons. The members of the Board shall receive no salary for their services but shall be entitled to receive per diem and allowances in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 138-5

.

Treasurer. — The Board shall select the Authority’s treasurer. The Board shall require a surety bond of the appointee in the amount as the Board may fix, and the premium shall be paid by the Authority as a necessary expense of the Authority.

Executive Director and other Employees. — The Board shall appoint an executive director, whose salary shall be fixed by the Board, to serve at its pleasure. The executive director or a person designated by the executive director shall appoint, employ, dismiss, and, within the limits of available funding, fix the compensation of other employees as considered necessary.

Office. — The Board shall establish an office for the transaction of the Authority’s business at the place the Board finds advisable or necessary to implement the provisions of this Chapter.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 108(b)-(e); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 777, s. 4(d), (d1); 2011-340, ss. 1(a)-(d); 2012-194, s. 17; 2021-90, s. 25.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-340, ss. 1(a) through 1(d), effective July 1, 2011, rewrote the last sentence of subsection (a), which formerly read: “The Authority shall be located within the Department of Transportation, but shall exercise all of its powers, including the power to employ, direct, and supervise all personnel, independently of the Secretary of Transportation and, notwithstanding any other provision of law, shall be subject to the direction and supervision of the Secretary only with respect to the management functions of coordinating and reporting”; in subdivision (b)(1), substituted “Six members” for “Seven members” and added the last two sentences; in subdivisions (b)(2) and (b)(3), added the last sentence; added subdivision (b)(11); deleted subsection (c), which read:
“Selection Criteria. — In making appointments to the Board, the Governor and the General Assembly shall give consideration to the geographical representation of the Western region, the Piedmont region, and the Eastern region of the State. In addition, at least one member appointed by the Governor shall be representative of business, at least one shall be representative of agribusiness, at least one shall be representative of environmental interests, and at least one shall be representative of industrial interests.”; and added subsection (d1).

Session Laws 2012-194, s. 17, effective July 17, 2012, added “the” preceding “commercial” in subdivision (b)(1).

Session Laws 2021-90, s. 25.1, effective July 22, 2021, deleted the last sentence in subdivision (b)(1), which read: “Of the Governor’s six appointments, at least one member shall come from each of the State’s three regions: Western, Piedmont, and Eastern.”; in subdivisions (b)(5), and (b)(6), inserted “or the President’s designee” and made stylistic changes; added “or the Commissioner’s designee” in subdivision (b)(10); and added “or the Secretary’s designee” in subdivision (b)(11).

§ 63A-4.
Powers of the Authority.

The Authority shall have all of the powers necessary to execute the provisions of this Chapter, which shall include at least the following powers:

The powers of a corporate body, including the power to sue and be sued, to make contracts, to adopt and use a common seal, and to alter the adopted seal as needed.

To establish, finance, purchase, construct, operate, and regulate cargo airport complexes and to own, finance, lease, sell, or manage real or personal property.

To charge and collect fees and rents for the use of the cargo airport complexes or for services rendered in the operation of the complexes.

To contract and enter into agreements with the State, local governments, other authorities of North Carolina, and other states for the interchange of business and to facilitate the business of cargo airport complexes.

To rent, lease, purchase, acquire, own, encumber, dispose of, or mortgage real or personal property, including the power to acquire property by eminent domain pursuant to

G.S. 63A-6

.

To establish, construct, purchase, maintain, equip, and operate any structure or facilities to aid commerce associated with a cargo airport complex, including the construction of highways, bridges, shipping facilities, electronic cargo transfer systems, mass transit systems, and other transportation facilities. Before constructing a highway or a bridge, the Authority shall consult with the Department of Transportation.

To create and operate agencies and departments needed to implement this Chapter.

To pay all necessary costs and expenses in the formation, organization, administration, and operation of the Authority.

To apply for, accept, and administer loans and grants of money from any federal agency, from the State or its political subdivisions, or from any other public or private sources available, to expend the money in accordance with the requirements imposed by the lender or donor, and to give any evidences of indebtedness that are required. No indebtedness of any kind incurred or created by the Authority shall constitute an indebtedness of the State or its political subdivisions, and no indebtedness of the Authority shall involve or be secured by the faith, credit, or taxing power of the State or its political subdivisions.

To adopt, alter, or repeal its own bylaws or rules implementing the provisions of this Chapter.

To execute financing agreements, security documents, and other instruments necessary in exercising its power under this Chapter.

To fix, charge, collect, pledge, or assign revenues of the Authority.

To employ consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, and other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the Board and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the Authority, and, when approved by the Local Government Commission under

G.S. 159-123(e)

and (f) as if the Authority were an issuing unit, to select and retain financial consultants, underwriters, and bond attorneys in connection with the issuance of any bonds and to pay for their services out of the proceeds of any bond issue for which their services were performed.

To issue bonds or notes of the Authority as provided under this Chapter to pay the costs of a project.

To issue revenue refunding bonds of the Authority as provided under this Chapter.

To procure and maintain adequate insurance or otherwise provide for adequate protection to indemnify the Authority and its officers, directors, agents, employees, adjoining property owners, or the general public against loss or liability resulting from any act or omission by or on behalf of the Authority.

To purchase or finance real or personal property in the manner provided for cities and counties under

G.S. 160A-20

.

To enter into agreements with counties pursuant to

G.S. 63A-15

.

To exercise the powers granted political subdivisions under Article 4, Chapter 63 of the General Statutes, and to exercise the powers granted to municipalities and counties under Article 6, Chapter 63 of the General Statutes, governing public airports and related facilities.

To act as agent for the United States of America or any agency of the United States in any matter within the purpose of this Chapter. When acting as agent for the United States or one of its agencies, the Authority shall keep the interest of the State paramount.

With the approval of any unit of local government, to use officers, employees, agents, and facilities of the unit of local government for the purposes and upon the terms as may be mutually agreeable.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 6.3(b), effective July 1, 2013.

To receive and use appropriations from the State, including an appropriation from the proceeds of State general obligation bonds or notes.

To execute the powers provided in subsection (a) of this section, the Board shall determine the policies of the Authority by majority vote of the members of the Board present and voting, a quorum having been established. Once a policy is determined, the Board shall communicate it to the executive director, who shall have the sole and exclusive authority to execute the policy of the Authority. No member of the Board shall have the responsibility or authority to give operational directives to any employee of the Authority other than the executive director.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 2000-67, s. 25.3; 2013-360, s. 6.3(b).

§ 63A-5.
Taxation of property of Authority.

Property owned by the Authority is exempt from taxation in accordance with Article V, § 2 of the North Carolina Constitution. Property that is part of or is located on a cargo airport complex site and is not owned by the Authority, including property that is part of a special user project, is not exempt from tax due to its location.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.

§ 63A-6.
Acquisition, disposition, or exchange of real property.

General. — The Authority may acquire real property by purchase, negotiation, gift, devise, or eminent domain. Any acquisition by eminent domain by the Authority of real property or an estate or interest in real property must be reviewed and approved by the Council of State before it can become effective. When the Authority acquires real property owned by the State, the Secretary of the Department of Administration shall execute and deliver to the Authority a deed transferring fee simple title to the property to the Authority.

Eminent Domain. — To exercise the power of eminent domain, the Authority shall commence a proceeding in its name and may follow any procedure set by law by which a State agency or a political subdivision of the State may exercise the power of eminent domain. The Authority’s exercise of the power of eminent domain is subject to review and approval by the Council of State.The Authority’s power of eminent domain applies to all property, including property that is owned by a State agency or a political subdivision of the State and is already devoted to a specific use other than as an airport established under Chapter 63 of the General Statutes. The Authority may acquire by eminent domain property that is owned by a political subdivision and is used as an airport established under Chapter 63 of the General Statutes only after obtaining the approval of the governing body of each political subdivision that established the airport. The Authority may not begin an eminent domain proceeding before it obtains the Council of State’s approval for the acquisition of the property to be condemned.

Exchange. — The Authority may exchange any property it acquires for other property usable in carrying out the powers conferred on the Authority and also, upon the payment of just compensation, may remove a building, a terminal, or another structure from land needed for its purposes and reconstruct the structure on another location. The Authority may not use the power of eminent domain to acquire property for exchange.

Site Selection. — In selecting a site for a cargo airport complex, the Authority shall consider comprehensive plans and land-use regulations adopted by local governments and the capability of local governments to provide services as specified in subdivisions (1) through (3) of this subsection. This subsection shall not be construed to require the Authority to comply with any local ordinance, regulation, or plan except as may be otherwise specifically provided by federal or State law, regulation, or rule. Plans, regulations, and capabilities to be considered are:

Local comprehensive plans, including education, emergency response, law enforcement, water supply, stormwater management, solid waste management, and wastewater treatment.

Local land use regulations, including appearance, floodplain zoning, subdivision zoning, and watershed protection elements.

The capability of local governments to provide services and manage growth and development related to establishment of a cargo airport complex.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 900, s. 108(f), (g).

§ 63A-7.
Police power.

The Authority has jurisdiction within a cargo airport complex site. The Board may adopt ordinances regulating traffic and parking within the cargo airport complex site and for the safety and welfare of those using the cargo airport complex. An ordinance adopted under this subsection shall be recorded in the minutes of the Board. A copy of the ordinance shall be filed in the office of the Attorney General of North Carolina and shall be posted at appropriate places in the cargo airport complex site. Any person who violates an ordinance of the Authority is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

The executive director of the Authority may designate employees of the Authority as special police officers. A person designated as a special police officer has jurisdiction within the cargo airport complex site to arrest a person who violates any federal or State law or any ordinance of the Authority and has other powers to the same extent as police officers of incorporated municipalities. An employee designated as a special police officer shall take the oath of a law enforcement officer set out in

G.S. 11-11

.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 499; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 63A-8.
Authority funds.

All Authority funds shall be deposited in one or more banks to be designated by the Board. Funds of the Authority shall be paid out only upon warrants signed by the treasurer or assistant treasurer of the Authority and countersigned by the chair, the acting chair, or the executive director. No warrants shall be drawn or issued disbursing any of the funds of the Authority except for a purpose authorized by this Chapter and only when the account or expenditure has been audited and approved by the Authority or its executive director.

History.

1991, c. 749, s. 1.